Maine, session 132, LD1954.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§3-B, as amended by PL 2019, c. 231, Pt. A, §§5
and 6 and amended by PL 2021, c. 669, §5, is repealed.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§3-F is enacted to read:
3-F. Grocery staples. "Grocery staples" means food products ordinarily consumed
for human nourishment.
A. Except as provided in paragraph B, "grocery staples" does not include:
(1) Spirituous, malt or vinous liquors;
(2) Medicines, tonics, vitamins and preparations sold as dietary supplements or
adjuncts, except when sold on the prescription of a physician;
(3) Water, including mineral bottled and carbonated waters, and ice;
(4) Dietary substitutes;
(5) Candy and confections, including, but not limited to, confectionery spreads. As
used in this subparagraph, "candy" means a preparation of sugar, honey or other
natural or artificial sweeteners in combination with chocolate, fruits, nuts or other
ingredients or flavorings in the form of bars, drops or pieces;
(6) Prepared food;
(7) The following food and drinks ordinarily sold for consumption without further
preparation:
(a) Soft drinks and powdered and liquid drink mixes, except powdered milk,
infant formula, coffee and tea;
(b) Sandwiches and salads;
(c) Supplemental meal items such as corn chips, potato chips, crisped
vegetable or fruit chips, potato sticks, pork rinds, pretzels, crackers, popped
popcorn, cheese sticks, cheese puffs and dips;
(d) Fruit bars, granola bars, trail mix, breakfast bars, rice cakes, popcorn cakes,
bread sticks and dried sugared fruit;
(e) Nuts and seeds that have been processed or treated by salting, spicing,
smoking, roasting or other means;
(f) Desserts and bakery items, including, but not limited to, doughnuts,
cookies, muffins, dessert breads, pastries, croissants, cakes, pies, ice cream
cones, ice cream, ice milk, frozen confections, frozen yogurt, sherbet, ready-
to-eat pudding, gelatins and dessert sauces; and
(g) Meat sticks, meat jerky and meat bars.
As used in this subparagraph, "without further preparation" does not include
combining an item with a liquid or toasting, microwaving or otherwise heating or
thawing a product for palatability rather than for the purpose of cooking the
product; and
Page 1 - 132LR1889(01)

(8) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any food product
containing any amount of cannabis or cannabis product.
B. When sold by a grocery store, "grocery staples" means products for internal human
consumption but does not include the following food and drinks ordinarily sold for
consumption without further preparation:
(1) Soft drinks and powdered and liquid drink mixes, except powdered milk, infant
formula, coffee and tea;
(2) Candy and confections, including, but not limited to, confectionery spreads. As
used in this subparagraph, "candy" means a preparation of sugar, honey or other
natural or artificial sweeteners in combination with chocolate, fruits, nuts or other
ingredients or flavorings in the form of bars, drops or pieces. "Candy" does not
include fruit bars, granola bars, trail mix, breakfast bars, rice cakes, popcorn cakes,
bread sticks and dried sugared fruit;
(3) Desserts and bakery items, including, but not limited to, doughnuts, cookies,
muffins, dessert breads, pastries, croissants, cakes, pies, ice cream cones, ice
cream, ice milk, frozen confections, frozen yogurt, sherbet, ready-to-eat pudding,
gelatins and dessert sauces; and
(4) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any food product
containing any amount of cannabis or cannabis product.
As used in this paragraph, "grocery store" means a store primarily engaged in the retail
sale of canned food, dry goods, fresh fruits and vegetables, fresh meats, fish and
poultry. "Grocery store" includes a convenience store, but does not include a separately
owned eating establishment located within a grocery store.
"Grocery staples" includes items such as bread and bread products, jam, jelly, pickles,
honey, condiments, maple syrup, spaghetti sauce or salad dressing when packaged as a
separate item for retail sale or when packaged as a bundled product that contains taxable
and exempt items.
Sec. 3. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 1, 2026.